Utah statutes.
63M-1-2407.   Reports of new state revenues, partial rebates, and tax
credits.
(1)  Before December 1 of each year, the office shall submit a report to the
Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, the Office of Legislative Fiscal
Analyst, and the Division of Finance identifying:
(a) (i)  the total estimated amount of new state revenues created from new
commercial projects in the development zones; and
(ii)  the estimated amount of new state revenues from new commercial projects
in the development zones that will be generated from:
(A)  sales tax;
(B)  income tax; and
(C)  corporate franchise and income tax;
(b) (i)  the total estimated amount of partial rebates as defined in Section
63M-1-2408 that the office projects will be required to be paid in the next
fiscal year; and
(ii)  the estimated amount of partial rebates as defined in Section 63M-1-2408
that are attributable to:
(A)  sales tax;
(B)  income tax; and
(C)  corporate franchise and income tax; and
(c)  the total estimated amount of tax credits that the office projects that
business entities, local government entities, or community development and
renewal agencies will qualify to claim under this part.
(2)  By the first business day of each month, the office shall submit a report
to the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, the Office of Legislative
Fiscal Analyst, and the Division of Finance identifying:
(a)  each new agreement entered into by the office since the last report;
(b)  the estimated amount of new state revenues that will be generated under
each agreement; and
(c)  the estimated amount of tax credits that a business entity, local
government entity, or community development and renewal agency could qualify
for under each agreement.
